Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-2904
Farm-to-school program; purpose; activities.

(1) The program shall provide for the purchase of locally and regionally produced or processed food in order to improve child nutrition and strengthen local and regional farm economies.

(2) The program shall link elementary and secondary public and nonpublic schools in this state with Nebraska farms in a manner that provides schools with fresh and minimally processed food for inclusion in school meals and snacks, encourages children to develop healthy eating habits, and improves the incomes of Nebraska farmers who will enjoy direct access to consumer markets.

(3) The program may include activities that provide students with hands-on learning opportunities, including, but not limited to, farm visits, cooking demonstrations, and school gardening and composting programs, and that integrate nutrition and agricultural education into the school curricula.

Laws 2021, LB396, § 4.
August 28, 2021